Maryland, session 2026, SB0946.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0946*

SENATE BILL 946
5A–303.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Affordable housing” means a project or undertaking that has received
an allocation of federal low–income housing tax credits by the Department of Housing and
Community Development.
(3) “Agricultural structure” means a certified historic structure that is used
or was used as an agricultural facility or for purposes related to agriculture.
(4) (i) “Business entity” means:
1. a person conducting or operating a trade or business in the
State; or
2. an organization operating in Maryland that is exempt
from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(ii) “Business entity” includes the governing body of a condominium
or cooperative housing corporation.
(5) “Certified heritage area” has the meaning stated in § 13–1101 of the
Financial Institutions Article.
(6) (i) “Certified historic structure” means a structure that is located in
the State and:
1. is listed in the National Register of Historic Places;
2. is designated as a historic property under local law and
determined by the Director to be eligible for listing on the National Register of Historic
Places;
3. A. is located in a historic district listed on the National
Register of Historic Places or in a local historic district that the Director determines is
eligible for listing on the National Register of Historic Places; and
B. is certified by the Director as contributing to the
significance of the district;
4. is located in a certified heritage area and certified by the
Maryland Heritage Areas Authority as contributing to the significance of the certified
heritage area; or
5. A. is located on property that is owned by the
Department of Natural Resources or one of its units;

SENATE BILL 946 3
B. is occupied by a person under an agreement with the
Department of Natural Resources under which the person pays for rehabilitation of the
structure as a condition of occupancy; and
C. meets one of the criteria listed under item 1, 2, 3, or 4 of
this subparagraph or is eligible to be listed in the National Register of Historic Places as
determined by the Director.
(ii) Except as provided in subparagraph (i)5 of this paragraph,
“certified historic structure” does not include a structure that is owned by the State, a
political subdivision of the State, or the federal government.
(7) “Certified rehabilitation” means a completed rehabilitation of a
certified historic structure that the Director certifies is a substantial rehabilitation in
conformance with the rehabilitation standards of the United States Secretary of the
Interior.
(8) (i) “Commercial rehabilitation” means a rehabilitation of a
structure other than a single–family, owner–occupied residence.
(ii) “Commercial rehabilitation” does not include a small commercial
project.
(9) “Common elements” means:
(i) all of the condominium except the units, as defined in § 11–101
of the Real Property Article; or
(ii) all of the cooperative project except the units, as defined in §
5–6B–01 of the Corporations and Associations Article.
(10) “Condominium” has the meaning stated in § 11–101 of the Real
Property Article.
(11) “Cooperative housing corporation” has the meaning stated in §
5–6B–01 of the Corporations and Associations Article.
(12) “Cooperative project” has the meaning stated in § 5–6B–01 of the
Corporations and Associations Article.
(13) “Director” means the Director of the Maryland Historical Trust.
(14) “Financial assistance” means action by the State or a State unit to
award grants, loans, loan guarantees, or insurance to a public or private entity to finance,
wholly or partly, a project that involves or may result in building construction, building
alteration, or land disturbance.

SENATE BILL 946
(15) “Governing body”, unless the context requires otherwise, has:
(i) with respect to a cooperative housing corporation, the meaning
stated in § 5–6B–01 of the Corporations and Associations Article; or
(ii) with respect to a condominium, the meaning stated in § 11–101
of the Real Property Article.
(16) “High performance building” means a building that:
(i) meets or exceeds the current version of the U.S. Green Building
Council’s LEED (Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design) green building rating
system gold rating; or
(ii) achieves at least a comparable numeric rating according to a
nationally recognized, accepted, and appropriate numeric sustainable development rating
system, guideline, or standard approved by the Secretaries of Budget and Management and
General Services under § 3–602.1 of this article.
(17) (i) “Historic property” means a district, site, building, structure,
monument, or object significant to:
1. the prehistory or history of the State; or
2. the upland or underwater archeology, architecture,
engineering, or culture of the State.
(ii) “Historic property” includes related artifacts, records, and
remains.
(18) “Level 1 opportunity zone project” means a small commercial project or
commercial rehabilitation completed by a qualified opportunity zone business if the
following information is provided to the Director:
(i) the date of the qualified opportunity fund’s investment in the
opportunity zone project and the amount of the investment;
(ii) the total project or business investment, including any leverage;
(iii) the address and census tract of the qualified opportunity zone
business and the qualified opportunity fund;
(iv) the North American Industrial Classification System Code for
the qualified opportunity zone business;

SENATE BILL 946 5
(v) an impact report, including both qualitative and quantitative
data on the qualified opportunity fund’s investment in the opportunity zone project and its
progress; and
(vi) any other information requested by the Director.
(19) “Level 2 opportunity zone project” means a small commercial project or
commercial rehabilitation completed by a qualified opportunity zone business if:
(i) the requirements for a Level 1 opportunity zone project are met;
(ii) 1. accountability to residents of the communities in the
qualified opportunity zone is maintained through their representation on any governing
board or any advisory board of the qualified opportunity zone business; or
2. a community benefits agreement is negotiated and agreed
to by community groups or strategic industry partnerships, as defined under § 11–701 of
the Labor and Employment Article, in the opportunity zone and the qualified opportunity
zone business that specifies a range of community benefits that the business agrees to
provide as part of the development project; and
(iii) 1. for an opportunity zone project located entirely within a
municipal corporation, the municipal corporation, by resolution or by letter, delivered to
the Director by the municipal corporation’s authorized designee, approves the provision
within the municipal corporation of the enhanced tax credits under this section; or
2. for an opportunity zone project that is not located entirely
within a municipal corporation, the county, by resolution or by letter, delivered to the
Director by the county’s authorized designee, approves the provision within the county of
the enhanced tax credits under this section.
(20) “Local historic district” means a district that the governing body of a
county or municipal corporation, or the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore, has
designated under local law as historic.
(21) “National register structure” means a structure that is:
(i) listed on the National Register of Historic Places; or
(ii) located in a historic district listed on the National Register of
Historic Places and certified by the Director as contributing to the significance of the
district.
(22) “Opportunity zone project” means a certified rehabilitation within a
geographical area designated and in effect as a qualified opportunity zone in the State
under § 1400Z–1 of the Internal Revenue Code.

SENATE BILL 946
(23) “Political subdivision” means a county or municipal corporation of the
State.
(24) “Post–World War II structure” means a certified historic structure that
was built after December 31, 1944, but before January 1, 1970.
(25) “Qualified opportunity fund” has the meaning stated in § 6–1001 of the
Economic Development Article.
(26) “Qualified opportunity zone” has the meaning stated in § 6–1001 of the
Economic Development Article.
(27) “Qualified opportunity zone business” has the meaning stated in §
6–1001 of the Economic Development Article.
(28) “Qualified rehabilitation expenditure” means any amount that:
(i) is properly chargeable to a capital account;
(ii) is expended in the rehabilitation of a structure that by the end of
the calendar year in which the certified rehabilitation is completed is a certified historic
structure; AND
(iii) is expended in compliance with a plan of proposed rehabilitation
that has been approved by the Director[; and
(iv) is not funded, financed, or otherwise reimbursed by any:
1. State or local grant;
2. grant made from the proceeds of tax–exempt bonds issued
by the State, a political subdivision of the State, or an instrumentality of the State or of a
political subdivision of the State;
3. State tax credit other than the tax credit under this
section; or
4. other financial assistance from the State or a political
subdivision of the State, other than a loan that must be repaid at an interest rate that is
greater than the interest rate on general obligation bonds issued by the State at the most
recent bond sale prior to the time the loan is made].
(29) (i) “Single–family, owner–occupied residence” means a structure or
a portion of a structure occupied by the owner and the owner’s immediate family as their
primary or secondary residence.
(ii) “Single–family, owner–occupied residence” includes:

SENATE BILL 946 7
1. a residential unit in a cooperative project owned by or
leased to a cooperative housing corporation and leased for exclusive occupancy to, and
occupied by, a member of the corporation and the member’s immediate family under a
proprietary lease;
2. a structure that is described under paragraph (6)(i)5 of
this subsection; and
3. a small commercial project.
(30) “Small commercial project” means a rehabilitation of a structure if:
(i) the qualified rehabilitation expenditures do not exceed $500,000;
and
(ii) 1. the structure is primarily used for commercial,
income–producing purposes;
2. the structure:
A. is a residential unit in a consecutive series of similar
residential units that are arranged in a row, side by side; and
B. is sold as part of a development project for exclusive
occupancy to, and occupied by, the resident;
3. the structure is a targeted project; or
4. the structure is a condominium or cooperative project and
the rehabilitation targets only the common elements of the condominium or cooperative
project.
(31) “Sustainable Growth Subcabinet” means the Sustainable Growth
Subcabinet established under Title 9, Subtitle 14 of the State Government Article.
(32) “State unit” has the meaning stated in § 11–101 of the State
Government Article.
(33) “Substantial rehabilitation” means rehabilitation of a structure for
which the qualified rehabilitation expenditures, during the [24–month] 60–MONTH period
selected by the individual or business entity ending with or within the taxable year, exceed:
(i) for single–family, owner–occupied residential property, $5,000;
or
(ii) for all other property, the greater of:

SENATE BILL 946
1. the adjusted basis of the structure; or
2. $25,000.
(34) “Targeted project” means a rehabilitation of:
(i) an agricultural structure; or
(ii) a post–World War II structure.
(b) (1) The Director, in consultation with the Sustainable Growth Subcabinet,
shall adopt regulations to:
(i) establish procedures and standards for certifying historic
structures and rehabilitations under this section;
(ii) for commercial rehabilitations, establish an application process
for the award of initial credit certificates for historic revitalization tax credits consistent
with the requirements of this subsection;
(iii) for commercial rehabilitations, establish criteria, consistent with
the requirements of this subsection, for evaluating, comparing, and rating plans of proposed
rehabilitation that have been determined by the Director to conform with the rehabilitation
standards of the United States Secretary of the Interior;
(iv) for commercial rehabilitations, establish a competitive award
process for the award of initial credit certificates for historic revitalization tax credits that
favors the award of tax credits for rehabilitation projects that:
1. are consistent with and promote current growth and
development policies and programs of the State;
2. are located in areas targeted by the State for additional
revitalization and economic development opportunities due to the focusing of State
resources and incentives;
3. are located in areas where the political subdivision has
implemented regulatory streamlining or other development incentives that foster
redevelopment and revitalization in priority funding areas, as defined in Title 5, Subtitle
7B of this article, and the appropriate local governing body or the planning board or
commission, if designated by the local governing body, has certified to the Sustainable
Growth Subcabinet those regulatory streamlining or other development incentives; [and]
4. include affordable and workforce housing options; AND

SENATE BILL 946 9
5. ARE LIKELY TO HAVE A HIGH IMPACT ON THE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OF A COMMUNITY AND ARE LOCATED IN:
A. A SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITY DESIGNATED UNDER
TITLE 6 OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE;
B. A TRANSIT–ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT, AS DEFINED
UNDER § 7–101 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
C. AN ENTERPRISE ZONE DESIGNATED UNDER TITLE 5,
SUBTITLE 7 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE;
D. AN ARTS AND ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT
DESIGNATED UNDER TITLE 4, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
ARTICLE; OR
E. A MAIN STREET MARYLAND COMMUNITY
DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT;
(v) for commercial rehabilitations, establish procedures to announce
to the public the selection of a rehabilitation project for an award of an initial credit
certificate not later than 60 days after the selection is made;
(vi) for commercial rehabilitations, determine whether the certified
rehabilitation:
1. is a high performance building; or
2. qualifies as affordable housing or a Level 1 or Level 2
opportunity zone project;
(vii) for commercial rehabilitations, establish a required external
marker or, at a minimum, an internal marker for the rehabilitation project that identifies
that the rehabilitation was funded by historic revitalization tax credits;
(viii) as provided in paragraph (7) of this subsection, charge
reasonable fees to certify historic structures and rehabilitations under this subtitle;
(ix) for commercial rehabilitations, require documentation that the
applicant has ownership or site control of the structure in order to demonstrate the ability
to meet the requirement to begin work as required under subsection (c)(3)(i)1 of this section;
(x) for commercial rehabilitations, provide a time limit for approval
of the additional tax credit for high performance buildings, affordable housing, or Level 1
or Level 2 opportunity zone projects provided for in subsection (c)(1)(ii) of this section;

SENATE BILL 946
(xi) for commercial rehabilitations, establish procedures for the
transfer of the tax credit under subsection (c)(6) of this section;
(xii) for small commercial projects:
1. establish conditions regarding the percentage of the
structure that may be used for residential rental purposes if the structure is used for both
commercial and residential rental purposes;
2. establish application procedures for governing bodies of
condominiums and cooperative housing corporations and conditions regarding the
rehabilitation of common elements of condominiums and cooperative projects;
3. specify criteria for determining whether a certified historic
structure is:
A. an agricultural structure; or
B. a post–World War II structure; and
4. specify criteria and procedures for the issuance of initial
credit certificates under subsection (e) of this section; and
(xiii) specify criteria and procedures for approval of enhanced benefits
under this section for Level 1 and Level 2 opportunity zone projects.
(2) The Director may not certify that a rehabilitation is a certified
rehabilitation eligible for a tax credit provided under this section unless the individual or
business entity seeking certification states under oath the amount of the individual’s or
business entity’s qualified rehabilitation expenditures.
(3) Each year, the Director may accept applications for approval of plans of
proposed commercial rehabilitations and for the award of initial credit certificates for the
fiscal year that begins July 1 of that year.
(4) (i) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a small
commercial project shall be treated as a single–family, owner–occupied residential
property, including the limitation on the amount of the tax credit provided in subsection
(c)(2)(ii) of this section.
(ii) A small commercial project is subject to the credit recapture
provision in subsection (f) of this section.
(5) [(i)] For commercial rehabilitations, the Director may not accept an
application for approval of plans of proposed rehabilitation if:

SENATE BILL 946 11
[1.] (I) [any substantial part of the proposed] THE
rehabilitation work [has begun] HAS BEEN COMPLETED; or
[2.] (II) the applicant for a commercial rehabilitation has
previously submitted three or more applications FOR AN INITIAL CREDIT CERTIFICATE
for commercial rehabilitations with total proposed rehabilitations exceeding $500,000 in
that year.
[(ii) For commercial rehabilitations, the Director may accept an
application for approval of plans of a proposed rehabilitation for which a substantial part
of the proposed rehabilitation work has begun if the rehabilitation work has been approved
under the federal historic tax credit.]
(6) Except as provided in subsection (d)(3)(iii) of this section, not more than
60% of the total credit amounts under initial credit certificates issued for any fiscal year
may be issued for projects in a single county or Baltimore City.
(7) (i) The Director shall adopt regulations to charge reasonable fees to
certify historic structures and rehabilitations under this section which shall include:
1. a minimum fee for the second phase of the application
process;
2. for a commercial rehabilitation project, a final fee that
may not exceed 3% of the amount of the award of an initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit
certificate; and
3. for any other rehabilitation project, a final fee that may
not exceed 3% of the amount of the credit for which the rehabilitation would be eligible
based on the greater of the estimated or final qualified rehabilitation expenditures for the
rehabilitation.
(ii) The Director shall set the level of the fees so that the projected
proceeds from the fees will cover the costs to the Trust of administering the credit under
this section and the federal historic tax credit.
(iii) If a fee charged for a commercial rehabilitation is not received by
the Trust within 90 days after the Trust sends notice to the applicant that the fee is due,
the Trust may not:
1. issue an initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate for
the commercial rehabilitation; or
2. accept an application for a commercial rehabilitation from
the applicant during the 3 fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the fee was not
received.

SENATE BILL 946
(iv) The proceeds from the fees shall be deposited in a special fund,
to be used only for the purposes of paying the costs of administering the credit under this
section and the federal historic tax credit.
(v) Any unused balance of the fund at the end of each fiscal year
shall be transferred to the Reserve Fund established under subsection (d) of this section
and shall increase the amount of the initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificates that
the Trust may issue for the following fiscal year.
(8) If an initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate expires or is
otherwise unclaimed as provided for under this section, the amount of the credit certificate
shall:
(i) remain in the Reserve Fund established under subsection (d) of
this section; and
(ii) increase the amount of the initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit
certificates that the Trust may issue for the following fiscal year.
(c) (1) (i) Except as otherwise provided in this section, for the taxable year
in which a certified rehabilitation is completed, an individual or business entity may claim
a tax credit in an amount equal to 20% of the individual’s or business entity’s qualified
rehabilitation expenditures for the rehabilitation.
(ii) For a commercial rehabilitation, an individual or business entity
may claim an additional tax credit in an amount equal to 5% of the individual’s or business
entity’s qualified rehabilitation expenditures if the certified rehabilitation is a certified
historic structure and:
1. is a high performance building; or
2. qualifies as affordable housing or a Level 1 opportunity
zone project.
(iii) For a commercial rehabilitation, a business entity may claim an
additional tax credit in an amount equal to 7.5% of the business entity’s qualified
rehabilitation expenditures if the certified rehabilitation is a certified historic structure
and qualifies as a Level 2 opportunity zone project.
(2) (i) For any commercial rehabilitation, the State tax credit allowed
under this section may not exceed the lesser of:
1. A. $5,000,000 for any commercial rehabilitation other
than a Level 1 or Level 2 opportunity zone project;
B. $5,250,000 for a Level 1 opportunity zone project; or

SENATE BILL 946 13
C. $5,500,000 for a Level 2 opportunity zone project; or
2. the maximum amount specified under the initial credit
certificate issued for the rehabilitation.
(ii) For a rehabilitation other than a commercial rehabilitation, the
State tax credit allowed under this section may not exceed:
1. $50,000 for a rehabilitation other than a Level 1 or Level
2 opportunity zone project;
2. $55,000 for a Level 1 opportunity zone project; or
3. $60,000 for a Level 2 opportunity zone project.
(iii) For the purposes of the limitation under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph[,]:
1. the following shall be treated as a single commercial
rehabilitation:
[1.] A. the phased rehabilitation of the same structure or
property; or
[2.] B. the separate rehabilitation of different components
of the same structure or property; AND
2. EACH STRUCTURE THAT IS PART OF A PHASED
REHABILITATION OF A CAMPUS WITH MULTIPLE STRUCTURES SHALL BE TREATED
AS A SEPARATE COMMERCIAL REHABILITATION.
(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the initial AND
SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate for a proposed commercial rehabilitation shall expire
and the credit under this section may not be claimed if:
1. within 18 months after the initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL
credit certificate was issued, the applicant has not notified the Trust, in writing, that the
commercial rehabilitation has begun;
2. the commercial rehabilitation is not completed within 30
months after the initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate was issued; or
3. the applicant does not submit to the Trust a request for
final certification of the commercial rehabilitation within 12 months after:

SENATE BILL 946
A. the 30–month expiration date under item 2 of this
subparagraph; or
B. the date to which the Director postponed the expiration
date under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph.
(ii) For reasonable cause, the Director may postpone:
1. the 30–month expiration date under subparagraph (i)2 of
this paragraph for an initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate for a commercial
rehabilitation; or
2. if the commercial rehabilitation was completed prior to the
expiration of the initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate, the deadline under
subparagraph (i)3 of this paragraph for submission of a request for final certification.
(4) If the tax credit allowed under this section in any taxable year exceeds
the total tax otherwise payable by the business entity or the individual for that taxable
year, the individual or business entity may claim a refund in the amount of the excess.
(5) The State credit allowed under this section may be allocated among the
partners, members, or shareholders of an entity in any manner agreed to by those persons
in writing.
(6) (i) In accordance with regulations adopted by the Director under
this section, the amount of the State tax credit allowed but not used for commercial
rehabilitations under this section may be transferred in whole or in part to any individual
or business entity.
(ii) 1. For the taxable year of any transfer under this paragraph,
the transferee under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may apply the tax credit against
the total tax otherwise payable by the transferee in that taxable year.
2. If the tax credit exceeds the State income tax of the
transferee in any taxable year, the transferee:
A. may claim a refund in the amount of the excess; or
B. may transfer the remainder of the tax credit to any
individual or business entity.
(7) (I) THE DIRECTOR MAY ACCEPT APPLICATIONS FOR
APPROVAL OF A SUPPLEMENTAL CREDIT CERTIFICATE FOR A COMMERCIAL
REHABILITATION IF THE COSTS FOR THE COMMERCIAL REHABILITATION HAVE
INCREASED DUE TO THE INFLATION OF CONSTRUCTION COSTS.

SENATE BILL 946 15
(II) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I)1
OF THIS SUBSECTION AND THE AVAILABILITY OF FUNDS IN THE RESERVE FUND, ON
APPROVAL OF AN APPLICATION FOR A SUPPLEMENTAL CREDIT CERTIFICATE, THE
AMOUNT OF THE INITIAL CREDIT CERTIFICATE MAY BE INCREASED.
(III) THE DIRECTOR SHALL GIVE PRIORITY TO ISSUING A
SUPPLEMENTAL CREDIT CERTIFICATE OVER ISSUING AN INITIAL CREDIT
CERTIFICATE.
(d) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Reserve Fund” means the Historic Revitalization Tax Credit
Reserve Fund established under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(iii) “Trust Account” means the Small Commercial Project Trust
Account established under paragraph (4) of this subsection.
(2) (i) There is a Historic Revitalization Tax Credit Reserve Fund that
is a continuing, nonlapsing special fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of this article.
(ii) The money in the Reserve Fund shall be invested and reinvested
by the Treasurer, and interest and earnings shall be credited to the General Fund.
(iii) If the fees paid in any fiscal year are less than the directly related
administrative costs of operating the Historic Revitalization Tax Credit Program, funds in
the Reserve Fund shall be used for the directly related administrative costs of the Program.
(3) (i) Subject to the provisions of this subsection, the Director shall
issue an initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate for each commercial rehabilitation
for which a plan of proposed rehabilitation is approved and the fees charged under
subsection (b)(7)(i) of this section are paid.
(ii) An initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate issued under
this subsection shall state the maximum amount of credit under this section for which the
commercial rehabilitation may qualify.
(iii) 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph and in
subsection (b)(7)(v) of this section, for any fiscal year, the Director may not issue initial OR
SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificates for credit amounts in the aggregate totaling more than
the amount appropriated to the Reserve Fund for that fiscal year in the State budget as
approved by the General Assembly.
2. If the aggregate credit amounts under initial OR
SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificates issued in a fiscal year total less than the amount
appropriated to the Reserve Fund for that fiscal year as a result of the limitation under

SENATE BILL 946
subsection (b)(6) of this section, any excess amount may be issued under initial OR
SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificates for projects in a county or Baltimore City in the same
fiscal year, without regard to the limitation under subsection (b)(6) of this section.
3. Subject to subsubparagraph 2 of this subparagraph, if the
aggregate credit amounts under initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificates issued in a
fiscal year total less than the amount appropriated to the Reserve Fund for that fiscal year,
any excess amount shall remain in the Reserve Fund and may be issued under initial OR
SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificates for the next fiscal year.
4. For any fiscal year, if funds are transferred from the
Reserve Fund under the authority of any provision of law other than paragraph (5) of this
subsection, the maximum credit amounts in the aggregate for which the Director may issue
initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificates shall be reduced by the amount transferred.
5. In each fiscal year, the Director shall estimate the amount
of fees to be collected based on the amount appropriated to the Reserve Fund and reserve
the difference between the estimated fees and estimated directly related administrative
costs of the Program to be used to administer the Program.
6. If the reservation of funds to administer the Program
under subsubparagraph 5 of this subparagraph is not necessary to cover the directly related
administrative costs of the Program, any excess amount shall remain in the Reserve Fund
and may be issued under initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificates for the next fiscal
year.
(iv) 1. Subject to subsubparagraphs 2 and 3 of this
subparagraph, for each of fiscal years 2018 through 2031, the Governor shall include in the
budget bill an appropriation to the Reserve Fund.
2. For each of fiscal years 2023 through 2025 and 2029
through 2031, the Governor shall include in the budget bill an appropriation to the Reserve
Fund of at least $20,000,000.
3. For each of fiscal years 2026 through 2028, the Governor
shall include in the budget bill an appropriation to the Reserve Fund of at least
$16,500,000.
4. The amounts described under subsubparagraphs 2 and 3
of this subparagraph shall be in addition to the appropriations to the Trust Account
required under paragraph (4) of this subsection.
(v) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 7–213 of this article, the
Governor may not reduce an appropriation for the Reserve Fund in the State budget as
approved by the General Assembly.

SENATE BILL 946 17
(vi) The Director may not issue an initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit
certificate for any fiscal year after fiscal year 2031.
(4) (i) Within the Reserve Fund, there is a Small Commercial Project
Trust Account.
(ii) 1. The Trust Account is established for the issuance of tax
credit certificates for small commercial projects.
2. Funds in the Trust Account shall be used only for transfers
from the Reserve Fund to the General Fund in accordance with paragraph (5) of this
subsection with respect to tax credit certificates issued for small commercial projects.
(iii) The Trust Account consists of:
1. money appropriated in the State budget for the Trust
Account; and
2. any other money from any other source accepted for the
benefit of the Trust Account.
(iv) For each of fiscal years 2024 through 2031, the Governor shall
include in the budget bill an appropriation to the Trust Account of at least $2,000,000.
(5) (i) Except as provided in this paragraph, money appropriated to the
Reserve Fund shall remain in the Fund.
(ii) 1. Within 15 days after the end of each calendar quarter, the
Trust shall notify the Comptroller as to each commercial rehabilitation completed and
certified during the quarter:
A. the maximum credit amount stated in the initial OR
SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate for the project; and
B. the final certified credit amount for the project.
2. On notification that a project has been certified, the
Comptroller shall transfer an amount equal to the maximum credit amount stated in the
initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate for the project from the Reserve Fund to the
General Fund.
(iii) 1. On or before October 1 of each year, the Trust shall notify
the Comptroller as to the maximum credit amount stated in the initial OR
SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate for each commercial rehabilitation for which the initial
OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate has expired under subsection (c)(3) of this section as
of the end of the prior fiscal year.

SENATE BILL 946
2. On notification that the initial OR SUPPLEMENTAL credit
certificate for a project has expired under subsection (c)(3) of this section, the Comptroller
shall transfer an amount equal to the maximum credit amount stated in the initial OR
SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate for the project from the Reserve Fund to the General
Fund.
(e) (1) Subject to the provisions of this subsection, the Director shall issue an
initial credit certificate for each approved small commercial project on a first–come,
first–served basis.
(2) An initial credit certificate issued under this subsection shall state the
maximum amount of tax credit for which the applicant is eligible.
(3) (i) Before fiscal year 2024, the Director may not issue an initial
credit certificate under this subsection after the aggregate amount of initial credit
certificates issued for small commercial projects totals $5,000,000.
(ii) Before fiscal year 2024, for a targeted project, the Director may
not issue an initial credit certificate under this subsection:
1. after the aggregate amount of initial credit certificates
issued for agricultural structures totals $1,000,000; or
2. after the aggregate amount of initial credit certificates
issued for post–World War II structures totals $1,000,000.
(iii) Beginning fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, the
Director may not issue initial credit certificates for small commercial projects under this
subsection for credit amounts in the aggregate totaling more than the amount of funds in
the Small Commercial Project Trust Account established under subsection (d)(4) of this
section.
(f) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) 1. “Dispose of” means to transfer legal title or, in the case of
a leasehold, the leasehold interest.
2. “Dispose of” includes to sell in a sale–and–leaseback
transaction, to transfer on the foreclosure of a security interest, or to transfer by gift.
3. “Dispose of” does not include to transfer title or the
leasehold interest to a creditor on creation of a security interest.
(iii) “Disqualifying work” means work that:

SENATE BILL 946 19
1. is performed on a certified rehabilitation; and
2. if performed as part of the rehabilitation certified under
this section, would have made the rehabilitation ineligible for certification.
(2) The credit allowed under this section shall be recaptured as provided in
paragraph (3) of this subsection if, during the taxable year in which a certified
rehabilitation is completed or any of the 4 taxable years succeeding the taxable year in
which the certified rehabilitation is completed:
(i) any disqualifying work is performed on the certified
rehabilitation; or
(ii) for a commercial rehabilitation, the certified rehabilitation is
complete and has been disposed of.
(3) (i) 1. If the disqualifying work is performed or the certified
rehabilitation is disposed of during the taxable year in which the certified rehabilitation
was completed, 100% of the credit shall be recaptured.
2. If the disqualifying work is performed or the certified
rehabilitation is disposed of during the first full year succeeding the taxable year in which
the certified rehabilitation was completed, 80% of the credit shall be recaptured.
3. If the disqualifying work is performed or the certified
rehabilitation is disposed of during the second full year succeeding the taxable year in
which the certified rehabilitation was completed, 60% of the credit shall be recaptured.
4. If the disqualifying work is performed or the certified
rehabilitation is disposed of during the third full year succeeding the taxable year in which
the certified rehabilitation was completed, 40% of the credit shall be recaptured.
5. If the disqualifying work is performed or the certified
rehabilitation is disposed of during the fourth full year succeeding the taxable year in which
the certified rehabilitation was completed, 20% of the credit shall be recaptured.
(ii) 1. The individual or business entity that claimed the tax
credit shall pay the amount to be recaptured as determined under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph as taxes payable to the State for the taxable year in which the disqualifying
work is performed or the certified rehabilitation is disposed of.
2. THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DEPOSIT AMOUNTS
RECAPTURED AND PAID UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH
INTO THE RESERVE FUND AND THOSE AMOUNTS MAY BE ISSUED AS INITIAL OR
SUPPLEMENTAL CREDIT CERTIFICATES FOR THE NEXT FISCAL YEAR.

SENATE BILL 946
(g) (1) The Comptroller may determine, under the process for return
examination and audit under §§ 13–301 and 13–302 of the Tax – General Article:
(i) the amount of rehabilitation expenditures used in calculating the
credit;
(ii) whether such expenditures are qualified rehabilitation
expenditures under this section; and
(iii) whether the credit is allowable as claimed.
(2) The authority of the Comptroller to examine and audit a tax return does
not limit the authority of the Director to determine whether a rehabilitation qualifies as a
certified rehabilitation or whether a certificate of certified rehabilitation has been properly
issued.
(3) The Comptroller may adopt regulations to require that an entity other
than a corporation claim the tax credit on the tax return filed by that entity.
(4) (i) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the credit under
this section may be claimed for the year a certified rehabilitation is completed, only if the
Director has, by the time the return is filed, issued a certificate of completion for the
certified rehabilitation.
(ii) A taxpayer claiming the credit may amend a return for the year
the certified rehabilitation was completed to account for a certificate issued subsequent to
the filing of the original return.
(iii) An amended return shall be filed within the period allowed under
the Tax – General Article for filing refund claims.
(iv) The provisions of this paragraph do not extend the period in
which a certified rehabilitation must be completed to be eligible for a tax credit under this
section.
(v) An amended return may account for an amended certification
issued by the Director for a certified rehabilitation.
(h) A refund payable under subsection (c) of this section:
(1) operates to reduce the income tax revenue from corporations if the
person entitled to the refund is a corporation subject to the income tax under Title 10 of the
Tax – General Article;
(2) operates to reduce insurance premium tax revenues if the person
entitled to the refund is subject to taxation under Title 6 of the Insurance Article; and

SENATE BILL 946 21
(3) operates to reduce the income tax revenue from individuals if the
person entitled to the refund is:
(i) an individual subject to the income tax under Title 10 of the Tax
– General Article; or
(ii) an organization exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(i) (1) On or before December 15 of each fiscal year, the Director shall report
to the Governor and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General
Assembly, on:
(i) the initial AND SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificates awarded for
commercial rehabilitations and small commercial projects under this section for that fiscal
year;
(ii) the tax credits awarded for certified rehabilitations completed in
the preceding fiscal year;
(iii) whether the tax credits awarded for certified rehabilitations
completed in the preceding fiscal year were located in:
1. a local historic district; or
2. a national register district; and
(iv) the estimated amount of directly related administrative costs
reserved in the Reserve Fund, the estimated amount of fees to be collected, the actual
directly related administrative costs, and the actual amount of fees collected.
(2) The report required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall include
for each initial credit certificate awarded for the fiscal year for a commercial rehabilitation:
(i) the name of the owner or developer of the commercial
rehabilitation;
(ii) the name and address of the proposed or certified rehabilitation
and the county where the project is located;
(iii) the dates of receipt and approval by the Director of all
applications regarding the project, including applications:
1. for certification that a structure or property will qualify as
a certified historic structure; and
2. for approval of the proposed rehabilitation; and

SENATE BILL 946
(iv) the maximum amount of the credit stated in the initial credit
certificate for the project and the estimated rehabilitation expenditures stated in the
application for approval of the plan of proposed rehabilitation.
(3) The report required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall include
for each certified commercial rehabilitation completed during the preceding fiscal year:
(i) the name of the owner or developer of the commercial
rehabilitation;
(ii) the name and address of the certified rehabilitation and the
county where the project is located;
(iii) the dates of receipt and approval by the Director of all
applications regarding the project; and
(iv) 1. the maximum amount of the credit stated in the initial OR
SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate for the project and the estimated rehabilitation
expenditures stated in the application for approval of the plan of proposed rehabilitation;
and
2. the actual qualified rehabilitation expenditures and the
final amount of the credit for which the project qualified.
(4) The report required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
summarize for each category of certified rehabilitations:
(i) the total number of applicants for:
1. certification that a structure or property will qualify as a
certified historic structure;
2. approval of plans of proposed rehabilitations; or
3. certification of the completed rehabilitations;
(ii) the number of proposed projects for which plans of proposed
rehabilitation were approved; and
(iii) the total estimated rehabilitation expenditures stated in
approved applications for approval of plans of proposed rehabilitation and the total
qualified rehabilitation expenditures for completed rehabilitations certified.
(5) The information required under paragraph (4) of this subsection shall
be provided in the aggregate and separately for each of the following categories of certified
rehabilitations:

SENATE BILL 946 23
(i) owner–occupied single family residential structures;
(ii) small commercial projects; and
(iii) commercial rehabilitations.
(j) (1) Subject to the provisions of this subsection, the provisions of this section
and the tax credit authorized under this section shall terminate as of July 1, 2031.
(2) On and after July 1, 2031:
(i) the tax credit authorized under this section may be claimed for:
1. a rehabilitation project, other than a commercial
rehabilitation, for which an application for approval of a plan of proposed rehabilitation
was received by the Director on or before June 30, 2031; or
2. a commercial rehabilitation for which an initial OR
SUPPLEMENTAL credit certificate has been awarded under subsection (d) of this section;
and
(ii) the Director shall continue to report to the Governor and the
General Assembly as required under subsection (i) of this section for as long as any
rehabilitation project for which the tax credit may be claimed remains incomplete.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall apply to tax credit certificates issued after June 30, 2026.